Maryland, session 2025, SB0861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
13–737.
(a) There is a Western Maryland Economic Future Investment Board.
(b) The Board consists of the following members:
[(1) one representative from the Department of Commerce, appointed by the
Secretary of Commerce, who shall serve as a nonvoting member;
(2) one representative of an economic development organization in each
member county, appointed by each member county’s respective commissioners, who shall
serve as a nonvoting member;
(3) one representative from District 1, appointed by the Speaker of the
House, in consultation with the District 1 delegation to the Maryland General Assembly;
(4) one representative from District 2, appointed by the President of the
Senate, in consultation with the District 2 delegation to the Maryland General Assembly;
(5) one county commissioner from each member county;
(6) one representative from District 1, appointed by the President of the
Senate, in consultation with the District 1 delegation to the Maryland General Assembly,
who shall serve as a nonvoting member;
(7) one representative from District 2, in consultation with the District 2
delegation to the Maryland General Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the House, who
shall serve as a nonvoting member;
(8) the State Senator representing District 1, who shall serve as an ex
officio nonvoting member;
(9) the State Senator representing District 2, who shall serve as an ex
officio nonvoting member;
(10) a member of the House of Delegates representing a subdistrict in
District 1, appointed by the Speaker of the House, who shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting
member; and

SENATE BILL 861 3
(11) a member of the House of Delegates representing a subdistrict in
District 2, appointed by the Speaker of the House, who shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting
member]
(1) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM DISTRICT 1, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DISTRICT 1 DELEGATION TO
THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(2) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM DISTRICT 1, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DISTRICT 1 DELEGATION
TO THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(3) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM DISTRICT 2, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DISTRICT 2 DELEGATION TO
THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(4) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM DISTRICT 2, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DISTRICT 2 DELEGATION
TO THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(5) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, AS A NONVOTING MEMBER, EXCEPT
THAT THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY VOTE TO BREAK A TIE ON ANY ITEM VOTED
BY THE BOARD.
(c) The voting members of the Board may elect a chair from among the Board’s
members.
(d) The Council shall provide staff for the Board.
(e) A member of the Board:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Board; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The voting members of the Board shall have final approval authority on:
(1) disbursements from the Fund; and
(2) projects selected in accordance with § 13–740 of this subtitle.
(G) A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY NOT SERVE AS
A MEMBER OF THE BOARD.

SENATE BILL 861
13–739.
(a) There is a Senator George C. Edwards Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide grant or loan funding to [capital
infrastructure projects and business development projects that improve the economic
conditions] CREATE JOBS AND SIGNIFICANT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
OPPORTUNITIES in the region.
(c) The Council shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund consists of:
(i) appropriations as provided in the State budget;
(ii) interest or other income earned on the investment of money in
the Fund; and
(iii) any other money accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(2) (I) In each of fiscal years 2024 through [2026] 2031, the Governor
shall include in the annual operating or capital budget bill an appropriation of at least
$10,000,000 to the Fund.
(II) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, THE
GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $10,000,000 TO THE FUND.
(e) Money in the Fund may be used only to:
(1) award grants and provide loans [to capital infrastructure projects and
business development projects to improve the economic conditions in the region] IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–740 OF THIS SUBTITLE; and
(2) pay the costs necessary to administer the Fund, including paying the
salary of the Executive Director.
(f) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to reversion
under § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(3) The State Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.

SENATE BILL 861 5
(4) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
13–740.
(a) A member county or local entity within a member county may submit a
proposal for funding under this part.
(b) To qualify for funding, a project shall be:
(1) a capital infrastructure project that:
(i) is linked to economic development in the region, as approved by
the Board; and
(ii) receives 20% matching funds from the member county where the
project is located, another local entity, a private business, or a combination thereof;
(2) a business development project that:
(i) encourages and promotes downtown neighborhood
revitalization, small business tourism, or other areas as approved by the Board; and
(ii) receives 10% matching funds from the member county where the
project is located, another local entity, a private business, or a combination thereof; or
(3) any other project that the Board determines is appropriate to promote
economic development in the region.
(c) (1) (i) The Board shall develop criteria to review, evaluate, and rate
project proposals for funding under this part.
(ii) The criteria in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall ensure
that the project:
1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, creates or retains AT LEAST 25 jobs;
2. creates or retains [businesses] AT LEAST 10 JOBS EACH
WITH WAGES THAT MEET OR EXCEED 150% OF THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME
FOR THE MEMBER COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS LOCATED, AS DETERMINED
BY THE MOST RECENT AVAILABLE DATA FROM THE STATE EXCEED 120% OF THE
STATE MINIMUM WAGE; OR
3. [increases wages; or

SENATE BILL 861
4.] creates [new State or local tax revenue] SIGNIFICANT
POPULATION GROWTH IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS
LOCATED, AS CERTIFIED IN WRITING TO THE BOARD BY THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS FOR THE MEMBER COUNTY OR THE MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT FOR
THE MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS LOCATED.
(2) (i) The Board shall choose which projects to award grants and loans
to based on the criteria developed in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) The Board or the Executive Director shall distribute grants and
loans to projects based on the decisions made by the Board in accordance with
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(d) (1) The Board or the Executive Director shall monitor and track the
progress of each project that receives funding under this part.
(2) If the Board determines that sufficient progress is not being made
toward achieving the requirements of this section, the Board may reclaim the awarded
funds.
(e) The funding provided in this section shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any funds that would otherwise be provided to the Board or the member counties.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.